trunk/apertium-es-ca/apertium-es-ca.ca.dix
<pardef n="/ser__vbser">
  <e>       <p><l>seríem</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>fórem</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>seria</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>fóra</l>      <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>seríeu</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>fóreu</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>series</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>fores</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>serien</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>foren</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>seria</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>fóra</l>      <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>serem</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>seré</l>      <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sereu</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>seràs</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>seran</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>serà</l>      <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>fóssim</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>fos</l>       <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>fóssiu</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>fossis</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>fossin</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>fos</l>       <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sent</l>      <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>essent</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sent</l>      <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>essent</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>fórem</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>fui</l>       <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>fóreu</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>fores</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>foren</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>fou</l>       <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>siguem</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>siguem</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sigueu</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sigueu</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sigues</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sigues</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>siguin</l>   <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>siguen</l>   <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>siguin</l>   <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>siguen</l>   <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sigui</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>siga</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sigui</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>siga</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ser</l>       <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ser</l>       <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>érem</l>      <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>era</l>       <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éreu</l>      <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eres</l>      <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eren</l>      <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>era</l>       <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>fóssim</l>   <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>fórem</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>fos</l>      <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>fóra</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>fóssiu</l>   <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>fóreu</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>fossis</l>   <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>fores</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>fossin</l>   <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>foren</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>fos</l>      <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>fóra</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>estat</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>sigut</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>estada</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>estats</l>    <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>estades</l>   <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>som</l>       <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sóc</l>       <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sou</l>       <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ets</l>      <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>eres</l>     <r>ser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="ser">             <par n="/ser__vbser"/></e>
<e lm="ser conforme" a="prompsit"><par n="/ser__vbser"/><p><l><b/>conforme</l><r><g><b/>conforme</g></r></p></e>
<e r="RL" lm="ser aplicable"><par n="/ser__vbser"/><p><l><b/>aplicable</l><r><g><b/>aplicable</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ser a punt" a="prompsit"><par n="/ser__vbser"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>punt</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>punt</g></r></p></e>
<e r="RL" lm="ser a càrrec"><par n="/ser__vbser"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>càrrec</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>càrrec</g></r></p></e>
<e r="RL" lm="ser igual" a="prompsit2uoc"><par n="/ser__vbser"/><p><l><b/>igual</l><r><g><b/>igual</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ser a temps" a="mireiafarrus"><par n="/ser__vbser"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>temps</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>temps</g></r></p></e>
